New Jersey, session 221, A2128.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Chief administrator" means the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. "Commission" means the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. "Fund" means the "South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association Fund" created pursuant to section 4 of this act. 2.    The chief administrator shall, upon proper application, issue South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plates for any motor vehicle owned or leased and registered in the State.  In addition to the registration number and other markings or identification otherwise prescribed by law, a South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plate shall display wording, and a design and color scheme chosen by the chief administrator, in consultation with the President of the South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association. Issuance of South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plates in accordance with this section shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 3 of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, except as hereinafter otherwise specifically provided. 3.    a.  Application for issuance of an South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plate shall be made to the commission on forms and in a manner as may be prescribed by the chief administrator.  In order to be deemed complete, an application shall be accompanied by a fee of $50 payable to the commission, which fee shall be in addition to all fees otherwise required by law for the registration of the motor vehicle and shall be collected by the commission and deposited in the South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association Fund created pursuant to section 4 of this act. b.    The annual fee for the registration of a motor vehicle that has been issued a South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plate pursuant to this act shall include, in each year subsequent to the year of issuance, a fee of $10 in addition to all fees otherwise required by law for the renewal of the registration of the motor vehicle, which shall be collected by the commission and deposited in the South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association Fund created pursuant to section 4 of this act. 4.    There is created in the Department of the Treasury a special non-lapsing fund to be known as the "South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association License Plate Fund." There shall be deposited in the fund the amount collected from all license plate fees collected pursuant to section 3 of this act, less the amounts necessary to reimburse the commission for administrative costs pursuant to section 5 of this act.  The monies in the fund shall be equally distributed to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs for the aid of veterans organizations and to the Emergency Management Section of the New Jersey State Police for use by local emergency management organizations.  Monies deposited in the fund shall be held in interest-bearing accounts in public depositories as defined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1970, c.236 (C.17:9-41), and may be invested or reinvested in such securities as are approved by the State Treasurer.  Interest or other income earned on monies deposited in the fund, and any monies which may be appropriated or otherwise become available for the purposes of the fund, shall be credited to and deposited in the fund for use as set forth in this act. 5.   a.  Prior to the deposit into the fund of the additional fees collected pursuant to section 3 of this act, amounts thereof as are necessary shall be used to reimburse the commission for all costs reasonable and actually incurred, as stipulated by the chief administrator, for (1)   producing, issuing, renewing and publicizing the availability of the South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plates; and (2)   any computer programming changes that may be initially necessary to implement the South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plate program established by this act in an amount certified as necessary by the chief administrator. b.   The chief administrator shall annually certify to the State Treasurer the average cost per license plate incurred in the immediately preceding year by the commission in producing, issuing, renewing, and publicizing the availability of the South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plates.  The annual certification of the average cost per license plate shall be approved by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor. c.    In the event that the average cost per license plate as certified by the chief administrator and approved by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor, is greater than the $50 application fee established in subsection a. of section 3 of this act in two consecutive years, the chief administrator may discontinue the issuance of South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plates. 6.   The chief administrator shall notify eligible motorists of the opportunity to obtain South Jersey Vietnam Veterans Association license plates by including a notice with all motor vehicle registration renewal, and by posting appropriate posters or signs in all commission facilities and offices, as may be provided by the department.  The notices, posters, and signs shall be designed by the chief administrator. 7.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month after enactment.